Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202060-3,184
Motor vehicle tax and fee; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 60-3,184 to 60-3,190:

(1) Automobile means passenger cars, trucks, utility vehicles, and vans up to and including seven tons;

(2) Motor vehicle means every motor vehicle, trailer, and semitrailer subject to the payment of registration fees or permit fees under the laws of this state;

(3) Motor vehicle fee means the fee imposed upon motor vehicles under section 60-3,190;

(4) Motor vehicle tax means the tax imposed upon motor vehicles under section 60-3,185; and

(5) Registration period means the period from the date of registration pursuant to section 60-392 to the first day of the month following one year after such date.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 184;

Laws 2007, LB286, § 52;

Laws 2017, LB263, § 54.